New Jersey, session 221, A4455.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, gross income shall not include net gains or income derived from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of qualified small business stock to the extent such 1gains or1 income 1[is] are1 exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 1202 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.1202). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply 1[retroactively]1 to taxable years beginning on or after 1the1 January 1 1[, 2025] next following the date of enactment1.